Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Address Confidentiality Act:

(1) Abuse means causing or attempting to cause physical harm, placing another person in fear of physical harm, or causing another person to engage involuntarily in sexual activity by force, threat of force, or duress, when committed by (a) a person against his or her spouse, (b) a person against his or her former spouse, (c) a person residing with the victim if such person and the victim are or were in a dating relationship, (d) a person who formerly resided with the victim if such person and the victim are or were in a dating relationship, (e) a person against a parent of his or her children, whether or not such person and the victim have been married or resided together at any time, (f) a person against a person with whom he or she is in a dating relationship, (g) a person against a person with whom he or she formerly was in a dating relationship, or (h) a person related to the victim by consanguinity or affinity;

(2) Address means a residential street address, school address, or work address of an individual as specified on the individual's application to be a program participant;

(3) Dating relationship means an intimate or sexual relationship;

(4) Kidnapping has the same meaning as in section 28-313;

(5) Program participant means a person certified as a program participant under section 42-1204;

(6) Sexual assault has the same meaning as in section 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, or 28-386;

(7) Stalking has the same meaning as in sections 28-311.02 to 28-311.05; and

(8) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 31;

Laws 2017, LB280, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB691, § 2.